Missouri, session 2026, HB13.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
Section 13.000. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part
of a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be
construed to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the
stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation
identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an
addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal
periods beyond June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-time
may, however, be requested in any future fiscal period as a new
decision item.

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 2
Section 13.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For the payment of real property leases, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 13.005, 13.010, and 13.015, and
further provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
from Section 13.005 to Section 13.010, and further provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between and within
departments, and further provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between federal funds within this section,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 13.025
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$609,091
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ..............................................................2,230,948
From DESE - Federal Fund (1105) ...................................................................................19,642
From Child Care and Development Block Grant - Federal Fund (1168) .........................93,095
From Assistive Technology Federal Fund (1188) ............................................................49,463
From Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Fund (1559) ...............................34,863
From Assistive Technology Loan Revolving Fund (1889) ..............................................14,941
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Expense and Equipment
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) .....................................................1,655,559
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ..........................................................279,639
For the Department of Revenue
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................712,506
For the Department of Revenue
For the State Lottery Commission
Expense and Equipment
From Lottery Enterprise Fund (1657) .............................................................................557,643
For the Office of Administration
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,036,479

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 3
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) .......................................484,314
From OA Revolving Administrative Trust Fund (1505) ................................................484,623
For the Ethics Commission
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................149,899
For the Department of Agriculture
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................293,938
From Department of Agriculture - Federal Fund (1133) ....................................................4,299
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647) ..........................................................................67,212
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ..........................................................................29,977
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ..........................................................................2,422
For the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................601,183
From DNR- Federal Fund (1140) ...................................................................................422,709
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ......................................................40,689
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..........................................................................106,950
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ........................................................37,238
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .......................................................................111,027
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) .............................................................11,934
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ..............................................................................................122,934
From Solid Waste Management Fund Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) .............................36,097
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .................................................................182,129
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ................................................................................................26,318
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) .....................................................49,253
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) ...............................15,115
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ..............................................................................................315,112
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ................................................................................162,727
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................................35,008
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................174,839
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................130,765
For the Department of Economic Development

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 4
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................13,570
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ..............................................1
For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................125,392
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ............................................................................95,102
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552) ............................................................................8,058
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .............................................................................9,222
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) .......................................................................22,426
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) ...........................................................1,083,756
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .............................................................2,637
For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................29,087
From DOLIR - Commission on Human Rights - Federal Fund (1117) ............................13,701
From DOLIR Administrative Fund (1122) .........................................................................5,282
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................485,341
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ..................................98,553
For the Department of Public Safety
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................225,092
From State Emergency Management - Federal Fund (1145) ..............................................9,893
From Veterans’ Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) .........................156,933
From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544) .......................................150,845
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus
Fund (2350) .........................................................................................................228,373
For the Department of Public Safety
100 For the State Highway Patrol
101 Expense and Equipment
102 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................243,924
103 From Department of Public Safety - Federal Fund (1152) ...............................................10,560
104 From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................1,383,464
105 For the Department of Public Safety
106 For the Missouri Gaming Commission

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 5
107 Expense and Equipment
108 From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................531,485
109 For the Department of the National Guard
110 Expense and Equipment
111 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................60,436
112 From Adjutant General - Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................1,452,692
113 From Federal Drug Seizure - Federal Fund (1194) ..........................................................28,700
114 For the Department of Corrections
115 Expense and Equipment
116 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,698,613
117 From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ..............................................................327,866
118 For the Department of Mental Health
119 Expense and Equipment
120 From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,236,000 one-time) ......................3,991,112
121 For the Department of Health and Senior Services
122 Expense and Equipment
123 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,644,165
124 From Department of Health and Senior Services - Federal Fund (1143) ....................2,885,739
125 From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus
126 Fund (2350) ......................................................................................................1,614,966
127 For the Department of Social Services
128 Expense and Equipment
129 From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $147,318 one-time) .......................11,860,867
130 From Department of Social Services - Federal Fund (1610) (including
131 $23,982 one-time) ............................................................................................6,555,998
132 For the General Assembly
133 Expense and Equipment
134 From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................................1
135 For the Lieutenant Governor
136 Expense and Equipment
137 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................57,189
138 From Missouri Arts Council Trust Fund (1262) ...............................................................76,119

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 6
139 For the Attorney General
140 Expense and Equipment
141 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................585,276
142 From Attorney General - Federal Fund (1136) ...............................................................169,369
143 From Merchandising Practices Revolving Fund (1631) .................................................144,167
144 From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................106,805
145 From Workers’ Compensation - Second Injury Fund (1653) .........................................106,805
146 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..................................................................................9,596
147 From Missouri Office of Prosecution Services Fund (1680) ............................................93,494
148 For the Secretary of State
149 Expense and Equipment
150 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................325,043
151 From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577) ................................................................54,475
152 For the State Auditor
153 Expense and Equipment
154 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................16,269
155 For the Judiciary
156 Expense and Equipment
157 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,660,813
158 From Judiciary- Federal Fund (1137) ...............................................................................27,171
159 From Judiciary Education and Training Fund (1847) .......................................... 173,353
160 Total .........................................................................................................................$61,052,376
Section 13.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For operation of state-owned facilities, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Section 13.005, 13.010, and 13.015, further
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between and
within departments and one hundred percent (100%) flexibility
between federal funds within this section, and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 13.025
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$619,316

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 7
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ..............................................................1,291,805
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ..............................505,078
From Child Care and Development Block Grant - Federal Fund (1168) .......................245,044
For the Department of Higher Education and
Workforce Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................358,091
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ........................................................665,912
For the Department of Revenue
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,742,776
For the Office of Administration
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $75,000 one-time) .........................10,138,110
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ....................................1,168,730
From Children’s Trust Fund (1694) ..................................................................................36,123
For the Department of Agriculture
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................158,032
From Department of Agriculture - Federal Fund (1133) ..................................................52,383
From Animal Health Laboratory Fee Fund (1292) ...........................................................51,912
From Animal Care Reserve Fund (1295)............................................................................7,667
From Commodity Council Merchandising Fund (1406) ....................................................4,210
From Single - Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Program Fund (1408) ...............................4,998
From State Milk Inspection Fees Fund (1645) ...................................................................5,505
From Grain Inspection Fees Fund (1647) ...........................................................................6,753
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ........................................................................160,168
From Missouri Wine and Grape Fund (1787) ...................................................................13,590
From Agriculture Development Fund (1904) .....................................................................2,484
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................392,617
For the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................845,434
From DNR - Federal Fund (1140) ..................................................................................382,505
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ......................................................62,494
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .......................................................................105,156

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 8
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ..............................................................................................162,360
From Solid Waste Management Fund Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) .............................11,539
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................................26,041
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) .................................................5,458
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ..................................................................................................4,609
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ..............................................................................................111,043
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................................46,716
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) .................................................................41,434
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ................................................................................39,885
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................183,052
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ...................................................................14,511
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) .....................................................................................1,491
For the Department of Economic Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................336,422
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ...................................117,714
From Department of Economic Development Administrative
Fund (1547) ...........................................................................................................40,190
For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548) ..................................................................42,427
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ..........................................................................264,158
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552) ..........................................................................47,232
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .........................................................................488,804
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) ..............................................................151,212
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .........................................................367,444
For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................169,472
From DOLIR - Commission on Human Rights - Federal Fund (1117) ..........................112,300
From DOLIR Administrative Fund (1122) .....................................................................633,596
From Division of Labor Standards - Federal Fund (1186) ...............................................10,172
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................705,815

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 9
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) .............................1,216,771
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ............................................................95,978
For the Department of Public Safety
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................397,758
From Veterans’ Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) .........................215,188
From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544) .......................................165,702
For the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ..............................258,802
For the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Gaming Commission
Expense and Equipment
100 From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................103,144
101 For the Department of Corrections
102 Expense and Equipment
103 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,605,713
104 For the Department of Mental Health
105 Expense and Equipment
106 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,225,779
107 From Department of Mental Health - Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................308,120
108 From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................10,855
109 For the Department of Health and Senior Services
110 Expense and Equipment
111 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,397,523
112 From Department of Health and Senior Services - Federal Fund (1143) ....................1,483,782
113 For the Department of Social Services
114 Expense and Equipment
115 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,660,138
116 From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199) ......................................162,541
117 From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................24,020
118 From Department of Social Services - Federal Fund (1610) .......................................1,090,371

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 10
119 From Department of Social Services Educational Improvement
120 Fund (1620) .............................................................................................................8,466
121 For the Governor
122 Expense and Equipment
123 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................783,114
124 For the Lieutenant Governor
125 Expense and Equipment
126 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................80,169
127 For the General Assembly
128 Expense and Equipment
129 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,778,940
130 For the Secretary of State
131 Expense and Equipment
132 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,045,532
133 From Secretary of State’s Technology Trust Fund Account (1266) .................................18,898
134 From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577) ................................................................10,249
135 From Investor Education and Protection Fund (1829) .....................................................38,756
136 For the State Auditor
137 Expense and Equipment
138 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................465,009
139 For the Attorney General
140 Expense and Equipment
141 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................724,281
142 From Attorney General - Federal Fund (1136) ...............................................................206,614
143 From Natural Resources Protection Water Pollution Permit Fee
144 Subaccount Fund (1568) .......................................................................................33,533
145 From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) .....................................................................50,512
146 From Workers’ Compensation Second Injury Fund (1653) .............................................50,765
147 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ................................................................................14,030
148 For the State Treasurer
149 Expense and Equipment
150 From State Treasurer’s General Operations Fund (1164) ...............................................272,535

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 11
151 For the Judiciary
152 Expense and Equipment
153 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 391,100
154 Total .........................................................................................................................$49,591,678
Section 13.015. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For the operation of institutional facilities, utilities, systems furniture,
and structural modifications, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 13.005, 13.010, and
13.015, and further provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between federal funds within this section,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 13.025
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,458,067
For the Department of Mental Health
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................25,445,349
From Department of Mental Health - Federal Fund (1148) ........................................2,370,523
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................14,532
From Department of Health and Senior Services - Federal Fund (1143) .........................11,576
For the Department of Social Services
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,503,475
From Department of Social Services - Federal Fund (1610) .......................................1,034,195
For the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................7,891
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 24,678
Total .........................................................................................................................$38,870,286

CCS SCS HCS HB 13 12
Section 13.020. To the Office of Administration
For the Office of Administration
For the collection of costs associated with state owned, institutional, and
state leased space occupied by non-state agencies, provided no
flexibility is allowed to or from this subsection
Expense and Equipment
From Revolving Administrative Trust Fund (1505) ..................................................$1,528,026
Section 13.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund ...........................................................................................$105,291,969
Federal Funds .............................................................................................................28,721,122
Other Funds .......................................................................................................... 12,516,352
Total .......................................................................................................................$146,529,443
